South Dakota, session 2026, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $500,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Education, for the purpose of providing a grant to a nonprofit organization located within the
state to provide financial support to school districts and accredited nonpublic schools
implementing the Jobs for America's Graduates program.
Section 2. The grant may be used only to:
(1) Match moneys received from private contributions or donations;
(2) Match any federal education or career readiness grants received by the Jobs for
America's Graduates-South Dakota program; or
(3) Support larger, collaborative efforts in which the nonprofit organization is a
partner.
Any moneys generated or efforts supported under this section must be directed
toward the operations of a Jobs for America's Graduates program in a school district or
accredited nonpublic school located within this state and may not be added to an
endowment fund.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures described in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. The state treasurer shall transfer any moneys currently held in the special
donation fund, created pursuant to § 13-66-3, to the general fund.

26.730.27 2 1244
Section 6. That § 13-66-3 be REPEALED.
Section 7. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
HB1244 ENROLLED

26.730.27 3 1244
An Act to repeal the special donations fund and make an appropriation to the Department of
Education for the provision of a grant to support the Jobs for America's Graduates-South
Dakota program.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1244
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1244 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1244 ENROLLED